Hawaii statutes.
§636-5 Action on judgment; penalty for
failure to credit payments. Whenever in any action brought on a prior
judgment, the complaint fails to credit prior payments on the judgment, the
defendant shall be entitled to offset against the true balance due on the
judgment an amount double the amount of any such credit in addition to any
other penalties by law prescribed in such circumstances unless the plaintiff
shall show that the existence or amount of the credit was in bona fide dispute
or that the failure to set forth the credit was inadvertent or the result of an
honest mistake. [L 1972, c 89, §3(c)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next